Tennessee statutes. Title 65 Public Utilities and Carriers
Part 1

General Provisions

65-15-101. Purpose — Participation in the unified carrier registration system.

It is declared that the legislation contained in this part is enacted for the sole purpose of promoting and conserving the interest and convenience of the public by conferring upon the department of revenue and the department of safety the power and authority, and making it the duty of the department of revenue and the department of safety to supervise and regulate the transportation of persons and property by motor vehicle over or upon the public highways of this state, and to supervise and regulate certain businesses closely allied with such motor transportation, so as to:

Regulate, foster, promote and preserve proper and economically sound transportation and authorize and permit proper coordination of all transportation facilities;

Relieve existing and future undue burdens upon the highways arising by reason of their use by motor vehicles;

Protect the welfare and safety of the traveling and shipping public in their use of the highways, and in their contact with the agencies of motor transportation and allied occupations; and

Protect the property of the state and its highways from unreasonable, improper or excessive use.

It is the intent of the general assembly that this state participate in the unified carrier registration system beginning with the date that it is established by the secretary of the United States department of transportation, in accordance with 49 U.S.C. § 13908. Pursuant to this intent, the commissioner of revenue is authorized to participate in the unified carrier registration plan and agreement established in accordance with 49 U.S.C. § 14504a, and to file on behalf of this state the plan required by 49 U.S.C. § 14504a(e).

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, on and after the date on which the secretary of the United States department of transportation establishes the unified carrier registration system in accordance with 49 U.S.C. § 13908, no foreign or domestic motor carrier, motor private carrier, leasing company, broker or freight forwarder, as defined in title 49 of the United States Code, shall operate any motor vehicles on the highways of this state without first registering with a base state under the unified carrier registration system and paying all fees required under the federal Unified Carrier Registration Act of 2005, compiled generally throughout title 49 of the United States Code.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, on and after the date on which the secretary of the United States department of transportation establishes the unified carrier registration system in accordance with 49 U.S.C. § 13908, the commissioner of revenue shall follow rules governing the unified carrier registration agreement issued under the unified carrier registration plan by its board of directors. The commissioner shall follow rules and collect fee assessments set by the federal secretary of transportation from foreign and domestic motor carriers, motor private carriers, leasing companies, brokers, and freight forwarders, and do all things necessary to enable this state to participate in the federal unified carrier registration agreement pursuant to the federal Unified Carrier Registration Act of 2005.

Acts 1933, ch. 119, § 21; C. Supp. 1950, § 5501.23 (Williams, § 5501.21); impl. am. Acts 1955, ch. 69, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-1501; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 30; 2007, ch. 484, § 97.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 11 provided that in order to carry out its functions, duties and responsibilities maintained under the provisions of Acts 1995, ch. 305, the public service commission shall retain and have the authority to exercise any and all of its powers and duties existing under title 65 prior to enactment of Acts 1995, ch. 305, including, but not limited to, the power to subpoena, the power to take evidence, and the power to examine. Upon the termination of the public service commission, the Tennessee regulatory authority is expressly granted the same powers and duties as set forth above for the public service commission in order to carry out its responsibilities established by the provisions of Acts 1995, ch. 305.

Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 46 provided:

“(a) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, upon the effective date of this section [May 26, 1995] all enforcement officers of the public service commission charged with the responsibilities of policing and enforcing the provisions of Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 65, Chapter 15, and any other employees of the public service commission necessary to assist in such policing and enforcing, shall be transferred to the department of safety, created by Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-3-101.

“(b) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, papers or other writings in the possession of the public service commission with respect to administering the enforcement of Title 65, assigned to the department of safety by this act, shall be transferred to and remain in the custody of the department of safety.

“(c) All leases, contracts and all contract rights, and responsibilities in existence with the public service commission with respect to the duties transferred by this section shall be preserved and transferred to the department of safety.

“(d) All assets, liabilities and obligations of the public service commission with respect to the duties transferred by this section shall become the assets, liabilities and obligations of the department of safety.

“(e) Any revenues from rates, fares, charges, fines, and other moneys received pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 65, assigned to the department of safety by this act, shall be allocated to the department of safety as approved by the transition team pursuant to Section 48 to implement the provisions of this act.

“(f) The commissioner of safety shall promulgate rules and regulations pursuant to Title 4, Chapter 5, to effectuate the purposes of this act.”

Cross-References. Apportionment of capital for purposes of franchise tax, § 67-4-2111.

Apportionment of earnings for excise tax purposes, § 67-4-2011.

Assessment of property for tax purposes, title 67, ch. 5, part 13.

Citizen transportation areas designated, § 65-15-115.

Enforcement by highway patrol, § 4-7-105.

Interstate commerce and government business excepted, § 65-15-105.

Liability insurance required, § 65-15-110.

Municipal powers to acquire and subsidize transportation systems, §§ 7-56-101 — 7-56-108.

Passenger transportation services, title 7, ch. 51, part 10.

Procedure for obtaining certificate or permit, § 65-15-109.

Transportation of intoxicating liquors, § 39-17-704.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 4 Tenn. Juris., Automobiles, § 22; 5 Tenn. Juris., Carriers, §§ 2, 58.

Law Reviews.

Administrative Law — 1961 Tennessee Survey (Val Sanford), 14 Vand. L. Rev. 1115 (1961).

Social Performance of Public Utilities — Effects of Monopoly and of Monopoly and Competition, 17 Tenn. L. Rev. 308 (1942).

65-15-102. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Airport limousine” means every vehicle designed and/or constructed to accommodate and transport passengers, not more than twelve (12) in number, exclusive of the driver, having an operating agreement with an airport providing for a fixed passenger fare and a fixed schedule, the principal operations of which airport limousine is confined to areas between the airport and fixed points in municipalities, counties and the suburbs of the same within a forty (40) mile radius of such airport;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of revenue unless otherwise indicated;

“Commuter van” means a motor vehicle, except taxicabs or airport limousines, used primarily for hauling not more than fifteen (15) passengers to and from their regular places of employment;

“Contract hauler” means any person, firm or corporation engaged in the transportation for compensation or hire of persons and/or property for a particular person or corporation to or from a particular place or places under special or individual agreement or agreements, and not operating as a common carrier and not operating exclusively within the corporate limits of an incorporated city or town, or exclusively within the corporate limits of such city or town and the suburban territory adjacent thereto, except “contract hauler” does not exclude those engaged in the transportation of mobile homes for hire or compensation within an incorporated city or town;

“Department” means the department of revenue unless otherwise indicated;

“Farm vehicle” means a motor vehicle that is:

Controlled and operated by a farmer as a private motor carrier of property;

Being used to transport either:

Agricultural products, or

Farm machinery, farm supplies, or both, to or from a farm;

Not being used in the operation of a for-hire motor carrier;

Not carrying hazardous materials of a type or quantity that requires the commercial motor vehicle to be placarded in accordance with 49 CFR 177.823; and

Used within one hundred fifty (150) miles of the farmer's farm;

“For-hire motor carrier” means a person engaged in the transportation of goods or passengers for compensation;

“Household goods” means personal belongings transported from one residence to another by motor carrier;

“Limousine” means any motor vehicle except a taxicab or sedan designed or constructed to accommodate and transport passengers for hire, with an extended wheel base and expanded seating capacity designed for the transportation of persons. The vehicle shall have additional rear seating capacity, area, and comforts; and shall be designed to transport not more than fourteen (14) persons, exclusive of the chauffeur/driver, and the principal operation of such vehicle is confined to the area within the corporate limits of cities and suburban territory adjacent thereto;

“Mobile home” means any factory assembled structure equipped with the necessary service connections and made so as to be readily movable as a unit on its “own running gear and designed to be used as a dwelling unit” without a permanent foundation which can consist of one (1) or more components that can be retracted for towing purposes and subsequently expanded for additional capacity; or of two (2) or more units separately towable but designed to be joined into one (1) integral unit;

“Motor carrier” means any person, firm, partnership, association, joint stock company, corporation, lessee, trustee, or receiver appointed by any court whatsoever, operating any motor vehicle with or without semitrailers attached, upon any public highway for the transportation of persons or property, or both, or for providing or furnishing such transportation service, for hire as a common carrier;

“Motor freight broker” means any person, firm, partnership, association or corporation engaged in contracting for the transportation of property through the agency of any motor carrier, contract hauler, or other carrier by motor vehicle, where the person so contracting with the shipper or consignor, for such transportation, is not the owner or operator of the agency of motor vehicle transportation used in the actual transportation, but who arranges for such actual transportation by others, pursuant to regular or special contract had with such actual transporting agent;

“Motor transportation agent” means any person, firm, partnership, association or corporation engaged, as principal or agent, in the selling, offering for sale, negotiation for, soliciting by advertisement or otherwise, arranging as an intermediary or otherwise, or that holds such person or firm out as one who sells, provides, furnishes or arranges for, transportation for any person or persons over the highways of this state upon a share-expense plan or for fixed compensation, either in the private motor vehicles of persons not motor carriers or contract haulers not holding certificates of convenience and necessity, interstate permit, or contract hauler's permit permitting the transportation of passengers over such highways between the points for which such transportation is sold or provided;

“Motor transportation agent” does not apply to the transportation of children to and from school;

“Motor vehicle” means any automobile, automobile truck, motor bus, truck bus or any other self-propelled vehicle not operated or driven upon fixed rails or tracks;

“Private carrier” means a person who provides transportation of property or passengers by a commercial motor vehicle and who is not a for-hire motor carrier;

“Public highway” means every public street, alley, road, highway, or thoroughfare of every kind in this state used by the public, whether actually dedicated to the public and accepted by the proper authorities or otherwise;

“Sedan” means any motor vehicle except a limousine or taxicab designed or constructed to accommodate and transport passengers for hire that does not have an extended wheel base or an expanded seating capacity designed for the transportation of persons. The vehicle has no additional rear seating capacity, area or comforts; is designed to transport not more than five (5) passengers, exclusive of the chauffeur/driver, the principal operation of which is confined to the area within the corporate limits of cities and suburban territory adjacent thereto, and is not operated on a fixed route or schedule;

“Shuttle” means any motor vehicle designed or constructed to accommodate and transport not more than fifteen (15) passengers for hire, exclusive of the driver, the principal operation of which is confined to the area within the corporate limits of cities and suburban territory adjacent thereto, and is operated on a fixed route or schedule; and

“Taxicab” means any motor vehicle except a limousine or sedan designed or constructed to accommodate and transport not more than nine (9) passengers for hire, exclusive of the driver, the principal operation of which is confined to the area within the corporate limits of cities and suburban territory adjacent thereto, and is not operated on a fixed route or schedule.

Acts 1933, ch. 119, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 5501.1; impl. am. Acts 1955, ch. 69, § 1; Acts 1972, ch. 683, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-1502; Acts 1982, ch. 622, § 1; 1995, ch. 305, § 30; 1999, ch. 97, § 1; 2007, ch. 484, § 98.

Cross-References. Buses, maximum gross weight and length, §§ 55-7-204, 55-7-205.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Carriers, § 58.

Law Reviews.

Administrative Law — 1959 Tennessee Survey (Harold Seligman), 12 Vand. L. Rev. 1057 (1959).

65-15-103. Exempt vehicles — Applicability.

The provisions of this part, except those providing for safety inspection and safety rules and regulations for motor vehicles provided for in § 65-15-111, do not apply to any motor vehicles, while used exclusively:

Airport limousines — for carrying persons and/or property between airport terminals and hotels, motels, and other designated points in any municipality, county or the suburb of the same served by such airport;

Ambulances and hearses — in funerals or as ambulances;

Charter vehicles — to any motor vehicle making casual trips on call or under contract, solicited by the party served, for the carrying of passengers; provided, that on such casual trips no operator shall be allowed to pick up any passengers along the route, nor be permitted on the return trip to carry any passengers other than those included in the original or outbound trip;

Commuter vans — to any motor vehicle, except taxicabs or airport limousines, used primarily for hauling fifteen (15) or fewer passengers to and from their regular places of employment, or to the organizers, sponsors or promoters of such vehicles under former § 65-15-115 [repealed];

Intracity transfer service — in-city transfer service by way of transporting property for-hire between points in any one (1) town, city or suburbs thereof, not over or along any definite, fixed, announced, or advertised routes between any points in such one (1) city, town or suburbs thereof; provided, that this exemption does not apply to motor vehicles transporting petroleum products and other hazardous materials, in bulk, in tank trucks or trailers, for-hire, other than those owned or operated by any person, firm or corporation engaged on May 17, 1971, in providing such transport services, unless they are exempt under subdivision (a)(7). No funds received by the department under this section may be used for purposes of funding any retirement benefit for any person, to secure actuarial soundness, nor to improve any retirement plan or benefit; and provided further, that this exemption shall not apply to contract haulers engaged in the transportation of mobile homes; provided, that the contract haulers performing these services as prescribed by this chapter be given thirty (30) days to apply to the department for the authority to continue operation;

Limousines — in the limousine service;

Milk and other perishable farm products and livestock vehicles — for transporting or delivering milk or milk products from the producer thereof to the purchaser from the producer, or to any motor vehicle used casually, by the owner, to convey perishable farm products or livestock to market;

Newspaper delivery vehicles — to any motor vehicle used primarily in the transportation of newspapers, or to any motor vehicle used casually, by the owner, to deliver newspapers while going to or from work, or to any commercial motor vehicle whose commercial use is not now subject to regulation by the department and whose use to deliver newspapers is incidental to its primary use;

Passenger hauling demonstration projects — to any motor vehicle operated pursuant to department approved demonstration projects conducted by state, local municipalities, counties, or metropolitan governments when such demonstration projects are of limited duration and will meet transportation needs in the hauling of passengers; provided, that the department of safety may inspect such vehicles for purposes of safety, and such vehicles shall be subject to § 65-15-111; provided, that the department of safety may establish a minimum level of insurance coverage to be required of all vehicles operating pursuant to this subdivision (a)(9). Vehicles operating pursuant to this subdivision (a)(9) are subject to the inspection, control, and supervision fee as provided in § 65-15-112. This subdivision (a)(9) does not apply in any county having a metropolitan form of government;

Railroad limousines and dray vehicles — for carrying persons and/or property between railroad depots and any points in any city, town or suburb thereof, in or adjacent to which such depot is located;

School and church vehicles — for transporting persons to or from school, Sunday school, church or religious services of any kind, upon special prearranged trips or excursions under the auspices of any religious or charitable organization;

Seasonal transportation of fertilizer for farm or dairy purposes — to any motor vehicle used on a seasonal basis to transport fertilizer to local dealers, farms, gins, or dairies for farm or dairy purposes; provided, that the department may inspect such vehicles for purposes of safety, and such vehicles shall be subject to § 65-15-111;

Sedans — in the sedan service;

Shuttles — in the shuttle service;

Taxicabs — in taxicab service;

Transportation of hot mix asphalt — to any motor vehicle while used in the transportation of hot mix asphalt when the owner, lessee or bailee of the vehicle is legally and regularly engaged in the business of selling or distributing such hot mix asphalt transported on such vehicle; provided, that the department of safety may inspect such motor vehicles for purpose of safety and such vehicles shall be subject to § 65-15-111; and provided further, that the department of safety is empowered to enforce this subdivision (a)(16) with respect to safety as if such vehicle were a common carrier;

Vehicles hauling ore, sand, gravel and other unprocessed products of the soil — to any motor vehicles used in the transportation of coal produced from mines located within this state, or products of the soil in unprocessed state, including, but not limited to, sand, gravel, chert or phosphate muck;

Vehicles hauling recovered materials — to any motor vehicle while used in the transportation of recovered materials from the point of generation to a processing facility or to the end-user of these materials or from the processing facility to the end-user of these materials; provided, that such vehicles shall be subject to the provisions of § 65-15-111 pertaining to safety regulation for motor vehicles. “Recovered materials” means those materials which have been diverted or removed from the solid waste stream for sale, use, reuse or recycling. “Recovered materials” does not include any materials being transported to a landfill; or

Vehicles used in selling or distribution of petroleum products — to any motor vehicle while used in the transportation of petroleum products when the owner, lessee or bailee of the vehicle is legally and regularly engaged in the business of selling or distributing such petroleum products transported on such vehicle; provided, that the department of safety may inspect such motor vehicles for purposes of safety and such vehicles shall be subject to § 65-15-111; and provided further, that the rate charged by any person hauling petroleum products as excluded by this subdivision (a)(19) shall be no less than the rates set by the department for hauling petroleum products by common carriers; and provided further, that the department of safety is empowered to enforce the provisions of this subdivision (a)(19) with respect to safety and rates as if such vehicle was a common carrier including its powers under former § 65-15-121 [repealed].

In addition to the provisions of subsection (a), the provisions of this part, except those providing for safety inspection and safety rules and regulations for motor vehicles transporting hazardous materials, do not apply to contract haulers or motor vehicles of contract haulers, while used exclusively for transporting liquid asphalt or any product containing liquid asphalt as one (1) of its ingredients; provided, that the department of safety may inspect such motor vehicles for purposes of safety rules and regulations under § 65-15-111.

Acts 1933, ch. 119, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 5501.2; Acts 1959, ch. 239, § 1; 1961, ch. 86, § 1; 1967, ch. 244, § 1; 1967, ch. 356, § 1; 1968, ch. 631, § 1; 1971, ch. 98, § 1; 1971, ch. 219, § 1; 1972, ch. 683, § 3; 1974, ch. 427, § 1; 1974, ch. 476, § 1; 1975, ch. 349, § 1; 1976, ch. 794, § 1; 1976, ch. 823, §§ 3, 4; 1977, ch. 163, § 1; 1977, ch. 275, § 1; 1979, ch. 424, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-1503; Acts 1982, ch. 622, § 2; 1992, ch. 590, § 1; 1994, ch. 705, § 3; 1994, ch. 774, § 2; 1995, ch. 305, § 30; 1999, ch. 97, §§ 2, 3; 2007, ch. 484, § 99.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1994, ch. 774, § 1 provided the following statement of legislative findings and purpose:

“The general assembly finds:

In 1980, the United States Congress passed legislation deregulating the rates charged by motor carriers for transporting recyclable materials. This legislation is codified at Title 49, United States Code, Section 10733.

As a result of this congressional action, the rates for interstate transportation of recyclable materials are established through direct negotiation between the motor carrier and the shippers.

When recyclable materials are transported within the State of Tennessee, however, the rates for such intrastate transportation are established by the motor carrier and are filed as binding tariffs with the Public Service Commission.

The rates charged for interstate transportation of recyclable materials are consistently lower than the rates charged for intrastate transportation of recyclable materials.

Because the State of Tennessee is firmly committed to policies which will promote recycling, it is important to lower the costs associated with recycling whenever possible. The cost of transporting recyclable materials, is one of the largest costs associated with recycling.”

Former § 65-15-121, referred to in (a)(19), was repealed by Acts 1999, ch. 97, § 22. Former § 65-15-115, referred to in (a)(4), was repealed by Acts 1999, ch. 97, § 21.

Cross-References. Ridesharing, title 65, ch. 19, part 2.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Carriers, § 58.

Law Reviews.

Evidence — Testimony as to Position of Vehicle after Collision Insufficient, 29 Tenn. L. Rev. 304 (1961).

1. Constitutionality.
2. General Law Not Affected.
3. Liability of Persons Exempt from Provisions of Chapter.
4. Casual Trips.

Exemption granted to any motor vehicle while used in the transportation of petroleum products when the owner, lessee, or bailee of the vehicle is legally and regularly engaged in the business of selling or distributing such petroleum products transported on such vehicles was not unconstitutional as creating an unreasonable classification. Gasoline Transp., Inc. v. Crozier, 210 Tenn. 96, 355 S.W.2d 98, 1962 Tenn. LEXIS 396 (1962).

Although former subsection (e) (now subdivision (a)(19)) is unclear, it is not void for internal inconsistency or vagueness: the predominant intention of the legislature was to enact a grandfather clause, allowing carriers operating on May 17, 1971 to continue to operate under grandfather certificates of public convenience and necessity, but subject to future regulation by the public service commission as to safety rules and regulations, inspection of vehicles, etc. Fleet Transp. Co. v. Tennessee Pub. Serv. Comm'n, 545 S.W.2d 4, 1976 Tenn. LEXIS 615 (Tenn. 1976).

Former subsection (e) (now subdivision (a)(7)) does not constitute invidious class legislation: this 1975 statute is no more than a belated grandfather clause to the 1971 enactment and any carrier in the state coming within its terms and making timely application could obtain its benefits. Fleet Transp. Co. v. Tennessee Pub. Serv. Comm'n, 545 S.W.2d 4, 1976 Tenn. LEXIS 615 (Tenn. 1976).

Private act regulating taxicab business in city did not suspend general law regulating motor vehicles, since vehicles used exclusively for taxicabs are excluded from the provisions of the general law. Large v. Elizabethton, 185 Tenn. 156, 203 S.W.2d 907, 1947 Tenn. LEXIS 315 (1947).

Where motor carrier operator came within subsection (d) (now subdivision (a)(13)) of this section and thus was not required to carry liability insurance as provided by § 65-15-115(c), operator was not liable for injuries to trespassing plaintiff who fell from wagon being drawn to the railroad by tractor driven by operator's employee who permitted plaintiff to ride on wagon contrary to operator's instructions. Ball v. Whitaker, 47 Tenn. App. 677, 342 S.W.2d 67, 1960 Tenn. App. LEXIS 101 (1960).

Carriers duly certified by public service commission to carry passengers are not exempted from the jurisdiction of the commission whereby they can make casual trips upon solicitation of the party served. Hammer v. Franklin Interurban Co., 209 Tenn. 399, 354 S.W.2d 241, 1962 Tenn. LEXIS 370 (1962).

Collateral References.

Use of highway by private and contract motor carrier, scope of exemptions in statutes relating to. 109 A.L.R. 565, 175 A.L.R. 1333.

65-15-104. Sight-seeing buses not exempt.

Motor vehicles, for which passengers are solicited, and which are operated to and from points of interest in or near any city, and which, therefore, perform the same service as a sight-seeing bus, are not excepted from this part, and this part shall apply to such motor vehicles, whether the same be called “buses” or “for hire cars” or by any other name.

Acts 1933, ch. 119, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 5501.2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-1504.

Cross-References. Jitney service, regulation by cities and towns, § 65-19-102.

Collateral References.

Motor buses, change from streetcars to, as affecting rights as between street railway company and abutting owners or owners across whose property the company has a right of way. 102 A.L.R. 391.

Motor buses, substitution of, for streetcars. 66 A.L.R. 1245.

Public service commission's power with respect to motive power. 5 A.L.R. 65, 39 A.L.R. 1517.

65-15-105. Interstate commerce and government business excepted.

Neither this part nor any provision thereof shall be construed to regulate or apply to commerce with foreign nations, or commerce among the several states of the United States, or to business conducted for the government of the United States, except insofar as the same may be permitted under the Constitution of the United States and the acts of congress.

Acts 1933, ch. 119, § 19; C. Supp. 1950, § 5501.21 (Williams, § 5501.19); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-1505.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Carriers, § 58.

65-15-106. Powers of department.

The department of safety is vested with the power and authority, and it is its duty, to license, supervise and regulate every motor carrier in the state and promulgate rules and regulations pertaining thereto.

The department of safety shall designate enforcement officers charged with the duty of policing and enforcing this part, and such enforcement officers have authority to make arrests for violation of this part, orders, decisions, rules and regulations of the department of safety, or any part or portion thereof, and to serve any notice, order or subpoena issued by any court, the department of safety, its commissioner or any employee authorized to issue same, and to this end shall have full authority throughout the state.

Such enforcement officers while enforcing and policing the provisions of this part also have authority to make arrests for any violations of the Tennessee Drug Control Act of 1989, compiled in title 39, chapter 17, part 4, and for violations of title 55, chapter 10, part 4, and § 55-50-408, when such violations are committed by a driver or an occupant of a vehicle regulated under this part.

Such enforcement officers, upon reasonable belief that any motor vehicle is being operated in violation of this part, shall be authorized to require the driver thereof to:

Stop and exhibit the registration certificate issued for such vehicle;

Submit to such enforcement officer for inspection any and all bills of lading, waybills, invoices or other evidences of the character of the lading being transported in such vehicle; and

Permit such officer to inspect the contents of such vehicle for the purpose of comparing same with bills of lading, waybills, invoices or other evidence of ownership or of transportation for compensation.

It is the further duty of such enforcement officers to impound any books, papers, bills of lading, waybills and invoices which would indicate the transportation service being performed is in violation of this part, subject to the further orders of the court having jurisdiction over the alleged violation.

Such enforcement officers shall also have the above authority with respect to anyone who procures, aids or abets any motor carrier in violation of this part or in such carrier's failure to obey, observe or comply with this part, or any such order, decision, rule, regulation, direction or requirement of the department of safety, or any part or portion thereof.

In a case in which a penalty is not otherwise provided for in this part, such person commits a Class B misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punished as provided for in § 65-15-113.

It is lawful for enforcement officers of the department of safety, regularly employed by the department of safety, acting through its director, to wear or carry pistols or other firearms at such times as they are in uniform or on active duty, in like manner as city or metropolitan police officers, wildlife resources agency officers and Tennessee highway patrol officers.

Department of safety enforcement officers may charge any person who is a driver, operator or occupant of a vehicle subject to department of safety jurisdiction pursuant to this chapter, and who has been charged with an offense involving the consumption or possession of alcoholic beverages, controlled substances or controlled substance analogues with a violation of § 39-17-1307, for the unlawful carrying or possession of a weapon. Any weapon possessed in violation of § 39-17-1307, may be confiscated by the arresting officer in accordance with § 39-17-1317. Weapons confiscated pursuant to this subsection (c), and declared contraband by the court of record exercising criminal jurisdiction, may be disposed of upon petition of the department of safety by the same procedure provided for weapon confiscations of the department of safety in § 39-17-1317.

Those enforcement officers authorized to carry firearms while on duty may retain after twenty-five (25) years of honorable service and upon retirement from the department of safety their service weapon in recognition of their many years of good and faithful service.

Except as inconsistent with the express terms and provisions of this part, the Tennessee public utility commission has the same power as to and over rates, practices, regulation, control and operation of motor vehicles, to which this part is applicable, as the department of safety now has under present law, with reference to railroads and utilities; provided, that nothing in this subsection (d) is intended to impose regulations upon contract carriers except insofar as the nature and character of their business so justify under the constitutions of Tennessee and the United States and the valid laws made pursuant thereto.

The department is authorized to apply for federal funds that may be available and to conduct any new entrant audits and review and compliance inspections that may be required by regulations promulgated by the United States department of transportation.

Acts 1933, ch. 119, §§ 4, 15; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 5501.4, 5501.17 (Williams, § 5501.15); impl. am. Acts 1955, ch. 69, § 1; Acts 1961, ch. 326, § 1; 1973, ch. 383, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1974, ch. 481, § 21; Acts 1980, ch. 702, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 65-1506, 65-1520; Acts 1983, ch. 474, § 1; 1988, ch. 863, § 1; 1989, ch. 211, § 1; 1990, ch. 881, § 1; 1993, ch. 441, §§ 1, 2; 1995, ch. 305, § 30; 1999, ch. 97, §§ 4, 5; 2007, ch. 484, § 100; 2009, ch. 321, § 28; 2012, ch. 848, § 85; 2017, ch. 94, § 53.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “Tennessee public utility commission” for “Tennessee regulatory authority” in (d).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

Cross-References. Monitoring of radioactive truck traffic, § 68-202-104.

Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Power to regulate passenger transportation service and authority of department of safety, § 7-51-1005.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Carriers, § 58.

Law Reviews.

Administrative Law — 1961 Tennessee Survey (Val Sanford), 14 Vand. L. Rev. 1115 (1961).

65-15-107. Interstate permits.

It is unlawful for any motor carrier, contract hauler, or exempt for-hire motor carrier to use any of the public highways of this state for the transportation of persons or property, or both, in interstate or intrastate commerce, without first having received a permit from the department or from any state designated as the base jurisdiction state for that carrier pursuant to 49 U.S.C. § 11506 [omitted] as amended by § 4005 of the Intermodal Surface Transportation Efficiency Act of 1991. Violators are subject to penalty pursuant to § 65-15-113.

Such interstate permits, when issued, shall be subject to such rules and regulations as the department may thereafter legally prescribe.

Acts 1933, ch. 119, § 5; C. Supp. 1950, § 5501.5; impl. am. Acts 1955, ch. 69, § 1; Acts 1959, ch. 317, § 1; 1977, ch. 425, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-1507; Acts 1993, ch. 327, §§ 1, 2; 1995, ch. 305, §§ 30, 31; 1999, ch. 97, §§ 6-8.

Compiler's Notes. The Intermodal Surface Transportation Efficiency Act of 1991, referred to in this section, is codified primarily in U.S.C., title 49.

49 U.S.C. § 11506 was omitted in the general revision of this Subtitle IV. Interstate Transportation, by Act Dec. 29, 1995, P.L. 104-88, Title I, § 102(a), 109 Stat. 804, effective Jan. 1, 1996. Section 11506 provided for registration of motor carriers by a state.

For current similar provisions, see now 49 USC § 14504a relating to the Unified Carrier Registration System plan and agreement.

Cross-References. Liability insurance required, § 65-15-110.

Procedure for obtaining certificate or permit, § 65-15-109.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Carriers, § 58.

Law Reviews.

Report on Administrative Law to the Tennessee Law Revision Commission, 20 Vand. L. Rev. 777 (1967).

65-15-108. Void and unenforceable covenants, promises, agreements or understandings concerning motor carrier transportation contracts.

A covenant, promise, agreement or understanding in or in connection with or collateral to a motor carrier transportation contract purporting to indemnify the promisee against liability for damages resulting from the negligence of the promisee, the promisee's agents or employees, or indemnitee, is against public policy and is void and unenforceable.

Subsection (a) shall not apply to the Uniform Intermodal Interchange and Facilities Access Agreement administered by the Intermodal Association of North America or other agreements providing for the interchange, use or possession of intermodal chassis, containers or other intermodal equipment.

Acts 2008, ch. 636, § 1.